California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A pharmacy technician may perform packaging, manipulative, repetitive, or other nondiscretionary tasks only while assisting, and while under the direct supervision and control of, a pharmacist. The pharmacist shall be responsible for the duties performed under their supervision by a technician.

(b) (1) In addition to the tasks specified in subdivision (a), and where the pharmacy has scheduled another pharmacy technician to assist the pharmacist by performing the tasks provided in subdivision (a), a certified pharmacy technician as defined in
 Section 4202 may, under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist, do any of the following:

(A) Prepare and administer influenza and COVID-19 vaccines via injection or intranasally, and prepare and administer epinephrine, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(i) The pharmacy technician has successfully completed at least six hours of practical training approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and includes hands-on injection technique, the recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to vaccines, and an assessment of the pharmacy technician’s injection technique prior to performing administration of vaccines.

(ii) The pharmacy technician is certified in
 basic life support.

(B) (i) Perform specimen collection for tests that are classified as CLIA.

(ii) “CLIA” means the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a; Public Law 100-578).

(C) Initiate and receive prescription transfers and accept clarification on prescriptions.

(c) This section does not authorize the performance of any tasks specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) by a pharmacy technician without a pharmacist on duty.

(d) This section does not authorize a pharmacy technician to perform any act requiring the exercise of professional
 judgment by a pharmacist.

(e) The board shall adopt regulations to specify tasks pursuant to subdivision (a) that a pharmacy technician may perform under the supervision of a pharmacist. Any pharmacy that employs a pharmacy technician shall do so in conformity with the regulations adopted by the board.

(f) A person shall not act as a pharmacy technician without first being licensed by the board as a pharmacy technician.

(g) (1) A pharmacy with only one pharmacist shall have no more than three pharmacy technicians performing the tasks specified in subdivision (a). A pharmacy with only one pharmacist shall have no more than one pharmacy technician performing the tasks specified in subdivision
 (b). If a pharmacy technician is performing the tasks specified in subdivision (b), a second pharmacy technician shall be assisting a pharmacist with performing tasks specified in subdivision (a). The ratio of pharmacy technicians performing the tasks specified in subdivision (a) to any additional pharmacist shall not exceed 3 to 1 except that this ratio shall not apply to personnel performing clerical functions pursuant to Section 4116 or 4117. This ratio is applicable to all practice settings, except for an inpatient of a licensed health facility, a patient of a licensed home health agency, as specified in paragraph (2), an inmate of a correctional facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and for a person receiving treatment in a facility operated by the State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Developmental Services, or the Department of Veterans
 Affairs.

(2) The board may adopt regulations establishing the ratio of pharmacy technicians performing the tasks specified in subdivision (a) to pharmacists applicable to the filling of prescriptions of an inpatient of a licensed health facility and for a patient of a licensed home health agency. Any ratio established by the board pursuant to this subdivision shall allow, at a minimum, at least one pharmacy technician for a single pharmacist in a pharmacy and two pharmacy technicians for each additional pharmacist, except that this ratio shall not apply to personnel performing clerical functions pursuant to Section 4116 or 4117.

(3) A pharmacist scheduled to supervise a second pharmacy technician may refuse to supervise a second pharmacy technician if the pharmacist determines,
 in the exercise of their professional judgment, that permitting the second pharmacy technician to be on duty would interfere with the effective performance of the pharmacist’s responsibilities under this chapter. A pharmacist assigned to supervise a second pharmacy technician shall notify the pharmacist-in-charge in writing of their determination, specifying the circumstances of concern with respect to the pharmacy or the pharmacy technician that have led to the determination, within a reasonable period, but not to exceed 24 hours, after the posting of the relevant schedule. An entity employing a pharmacist shall not discharge, discipline, or otherwise discriminate against any pharmacist in the terms and conditions of employment for exercising or attempting to exercise in good faith the right established pursuant to this paragraph.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, the board shall by regulation establish conditions to permit the temporary absence of a pharmacist for breaks and lunch periods pursuant to Section 512 of the Labor Code and the orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission without closing the pharmacy. During these temporary absences, a pharmacy technician may, at the discretion of the pharmacist, remain in the pharmacy but may only perform nondiscretionary tasks. The pharmacist shall be responsible for a pharmacy technician and shall review any task performed by a pharmacy technician during the pharmacist’s temporary absence. This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize a pharmacist to supervise pharmacy technicians in greater ratios than those described in subdivision (g).

(i) The pharmacist on duty shall be
 directly responsible for the conduct of a pharmacy technician supervised by that pharmacist.

(j) In a health care facility licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, a pharmacy technician’s duties may include any of the following:

(1) Packaging emergency supplies for use in the health care facility and the hospital’s emergency medical system or as authorized under Section 4119.

(2) Sealing emergency containers for use in the health care facility.

(3) Performing monthly checks of the drug supplies stored throughout the health care facility. Irregularities shall be reported within 24 hours to the pharmacist-in-charge and the
 director or chief executive officer of the health care facility in accordance with the health care facility’s policies and procedures.

(k) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 4038, a pharmacy technician may, outside of a licensed pharmacy, do both of the following:

(1) Perform compounding activities only under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist. The supervising pharmacist of the location where such compounding activities occur shall notify the board in writing.

(2) Administer vaccinations only under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 36.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy technician trainee may be placed in a pharmacy to complete an externship for the purpose of obtaining practical training required to become licensed as a pharmacy technician.

(b) (1) A pharmacy technician trainee participating in an externship as described in subdivision (a) may perform the duties described in subdivision (a) of Section 4115 only under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist.

(2) A pharmacist supervising a pharmacy technician trainee participating in an externship as described in subdivision (a) shall be directly responsible for
 the conduct of the trainee.

(3) A pharmacist supervising a pharmacy technician trainee participating in an externship as described in subdivision (a) shall verify any prescription prepared by the trainee under supervision of the pharmacist by initialing the prescription label before the medication is disbursed to a patient or by engaging in other verification procedures that are specifically approved by board regulations.

(4) A pharmacist may only supervise one pharmacy technician trainee at any given time.

(5) A pharmacist supervising a pharmacy technician trainee participating in an externship as described in subdivision (a) shall certify attendance for the pharmacy technician trainee and certify that the pharmacy
 technician trainee has met the educational objectives established by the training program.

(c) (1) Except as described in paragraph (2), an externship in which a pharmacy technician trainee is participating as described in subdivision (a) shall be for a period of no fewer than 120 hours and no more than 140 hours.

(2) When an externship in which a pharmacy technician trainee is participating as described in subdivision (a) involves rotation between a community and hospital pharmacy for the purpose of training the student in distinct practice settings, the externship may be for a period of up to 340 hours.

(d) An externship in which a pharmacy technician trainee may participate as described in
 subdivision (a) shall be for a period of no more than six consecutive months in a community pharmacy and for a total of no more than 12 months if the externship involves rotation between a community and hospital pharmacy. The externship shall be completed while the trainee is enrolled in the training program.

(e) A pharmacy technician trainee participating in an externship as described in subdivision (a) shall wear identification that indicates the pharmacy technician trainee’s status as a trainee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 37.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4116.

(a) No person other than a pharmacist, an intern pharmacist, an authorized officer of the law, or a person authorized to prescribe shall be permitted in that area, place, or premises described in the license issued by the board wherein controlled substances or dangerous drugs or dangerous devices are stored, possessed, prepared, manufactured, derived, compounded, dispensed, or repackaged. However, a pharmacist shall be responsible for any individual who enters the pharmacy for the purposes of receiving consultation from the pharmacist or performing clerical, inventory control, housekeeping, delivery, maintenance, or similar functions relating to the pharmacy if the pharmacist remains present in the pharmacy during all times as the authorized individual is present.

(b) (1) The board may, by regulation, establish reasonable security measures consistent with this section in order to prevent unauthorized persons from gaining access to the area, place, or premises or to the controlled substances or dangerous drugs or dangerous devices therein.

(2) The board shall, by regulation, establish conditions for the temporary absence of a pharmacist for breaks and lunch periods pursuant to Section 512 of the Labor Code and the orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission without closing the pharmacy and removing authorized personnel from the pharmacy. These conditions shall ensure the security of the pharmacy and its operations during the temporary absence of the pharmacist and shall allow, at the discretion of the pharmacist, nonpharmacist personnel to remain and perform any lawful activities during the pharmacist’s temporary absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 900, Sec. 4.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4117.

No person other than a pharmacist, an intern pharmacist, a pharmacy technician, an authorized officer of the law, a person authorized to prescribe, a registered nurse, a licensed vocational nurse, a person who enters the pharmacy for purposes of receiving consultation from a pharmacist, or a person authorized by the pharmacist in charge to perform clerical, inventory control, housekeeping, delivery, maintenance, or similar functions relating to the pharmacy shall be permitted in that area, place, or premises described in the license issued by the board to a licensed hospital wherein controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices are stored, possessed, prepared, manufactured, derived, compounded, dispensed, or repackaged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4118.

(a) When, in the opinion of the board, a high standard of patient safety, consistent with good patient care, can be provided by the licensure of a pharmacy that does not meet all of the requirements for licensure as a pharmacy, the board may waive any licensing requirements.

(b) When, in the opinion of the board, a high standard of patient safety, consistent with good patient care, can be provided by the licensure of a hospital pharmacy, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 4029, that does not meet all of the requirements for licensure as a hospital pharmacy, the board may waive any licensing requirements. However, when a waiver of any requirements is granted by the board, the pharmaceutical services to be rendered by this pharmacy shall be limited to patients registered for treatment in the hospital, whether or not they are actually staying in the hospital, or to emergency cases under treatment in the hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4118.5.

(a) A pharmacist at a hospital pharmacy shall obtain an accurate medication profile or list for each high-risk patient upon admission and discharge of the high-risk patient under the following conditions:

(1) The hospital has more than 100 beds.

(2) The accurate medication profile or list may be acquired by the pharmacist during the hospital pharmacy’s hours of operation.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy technician or an intern pharmacist may perform the task of obtaining an accurate medication profile or list for a high-risk patient if both of the following
 conditions are satisfied:

(1) The hospital pharmacy has a quality assurance program to monitor competency.

(2) The hospital has established policies and procedures for training and proctoring pharmacy technicians or intern pharmacists by the hospital pharmacy department and the pharmacy technician or intern pharmacist has completed that training and proctoring.

(c) The hospital shall establish criteria regarding who is a high-risk patient for purposes of this section, and shall determine the timeframe for completion of the medication profile or list, based on the patient populations served by the hospital.

(d) The board may adopt rules and regulations to carry out the purposes
 and objectives of this section.

(e) This section shall not apply to the State Department of State Hospitals.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a healing arts licensee licensed pursuant to this division from obtaining an accurate medication profile or list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 38.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy may furnish a dangerous drug or dangerous device to a licensed health care facility for storage in a secured emergency pharmaceutical supplies container maintained within the facility in accordance with facility regulations of the State Department of Public Health set forth in Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations and the requirements set forth in Section 1261.5 of the Health and Safety Code. These emergency supplies shall be approved by the facility’s patient care policy committee or pharmaceutical service committee and shall be readily available to each nursing station. Section 1261.5 of the Health and Safety Code limits the number of oral dosage form or suppository form drugs in these
 emergency supplies to 48.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy may furnish a dangerous drug or a dangerous device to an approved service provider within an emergency medical services system for storage in a secured emergency pharmaceutical supplies container, in accordance with the policies and procedures of the local emergency medical services agency, if all of the following are met:

(1) The dangerous drug or dangerous device is furnished exclusively for use in conjunction with services provided in an ambulance, or other approved emergency medical services service provider, that provides prehospital emergency medical services.

(2) The requested dangerous drug or dangerous device is within the licensed or
 certified emergency medical technician’s scope of practice as established by the Emergency Medical Services Authority and set forth in Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The approved service provider within an emergency medical services system provides a written request that specifies the name and quantity of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices.

(4) The approved emergency medical services provider administers dangerous drugs and dangerous devices in accordance with the policies and procedures of the local emergency medical services agency.

(5) The approved emergency medical services provider documents, stores, and restocks dangerous drugs and dangerous devices in accordance with the policies and
 procedures of the local emergency medical services agency.

Records of each request by, and dangerous drugs or dangerous devices furnished to, an approved service provider within an emergency medical services system, shall be maintained by both the approved service provider and the dispensing pharmacy for a period of at least three years.

The furnishing of controlled substances to an approved emergency medical services provider shall be in accordance with the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   (SB 443)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.01.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy, or a licensed wholesaler that is also an emergency medical services provider agency, may restock dangerous drugs or dangerous devices into an emergency medical services automated drug delivery system (EMSADDS) that is licensed by the board under this section. Dangerous drugs and dangerous devices stored or maintained in an EMSADDS shall be used for the sole purpose of restocking a secured emergency pharmaceutical supplies container as authorized in subdivision (b) of Section 4119. The EMSADDS may be used only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The emergency medical services provider agency obtains a license
 from the board to operate the EMSADDS. As a requirement for licensure, the EMSADDS shall be located on the premises of a fire department headquarters, a fire station, or at an emergency medical services provider agency’s location. A separate license shall be required for each location. As part of its license application, the emergency medical services provider agency shall provide: the address where the EMSADDS will be located; the name of the medical director responsible for overseeing the emergency medical services provider agency; the name of any designated pharmacist or licensed designated paramedic who is responsible for performing the duties as required under this section; the policies and procedures detailing the provisions under which the EMSADDS will operate; and the name and license number of the pharmacy or emergency medical services provider agency wholesaler that will furnish the
 dangerous drugs and dangerous devices through the EMSADDS.

(2) Each EMSADDS shall collect, control, and maintain all
 transaction information necessary to accurately track the movement of drugs into and out of the system for purposes of security, accuracy, and accountability.

(3) The medical director and designated pharmacist, or the medical director and the licensed designated paramedic, shall develop, adopt, and maintain policies and procedures detailing the provisions under which the EMSADDS will operate. At a minimum, the policies and procedures shall address (A) inventory controls, (B) training, (C) storage and security of the dangerous drugs and dangerous devices, and (D) safeguards to limit access to the EMSADDS to authorized staff only.

(4) The licensed EMSADDS operator shall limit access to the EMSADDS only to employees of the operator who are licensed by the state
 and as authorized in this section.

(A) An EMSADDS may only be restocked by the medical director, a pharmacist, or a licensed designated paramedic, each of whom may possess and transport dangerous drugs or dangerous devices for that purpose. The transport of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices for restocking into an EMSADDS shall be done in a secured manner to prevent theft or unauthorized access, and shall be done under conditions appropriate to meet storage and handling requirements of the dangerous drugs or dangerous devices. While the dangerous drugs or dangerous devices may be transported, representatives shall not store a dangerous drug or dangerous device at an unlicensed location.

(B) Only a medical director, a pharmacist, or a paramedic may remove dangerous drugs or
 dangerous devices from an EMSADDS to fill a secured emergency pharmaceutical supplies container. This access shall be observed by a second person who is also a paramedic, a pharmacist, or a medical director. Both the individual who removes dangerous drugs or dangerous devices from the EMSADDS and the observer shall record their participation in the removal of the dangerous drugs or dangerous devices via their signatures or use of biometric identifiers. The restocking of the secured emergency pharmaceutical supplies container from the EMSADDS shall occur at the licensed location of the EMSADDS.

(C) A medical director, a pharmacist, or a licensed designated paramedic may remove outdated dangerous drugs or dangerous devices from an EMSADDS. Any outdated dangerous drugs or dangerous devices shall be provided to a licensed reverse distributor
 for destruction.

(5) Every EMSADDS operator shall perform monthly inventory and inventory reconciliation functions. The medical director, designated pharmacist, or licensed designated paramedic shall perform a reconciliation and prepare a written report based on written policies and procedures developed to maintain the security and quality of the dangerous drugs and dangerous devices. The written inventory reconciliation report shall include all of the following:

(A) A physical count of all quantities of dangerous drugs and dangerous devices stored in the EMSADDS.

(B) A review of all dangerous drugs and dangerous devices added into and removed from each EMSADDS since the last monthly inventory.

(C) A comparison of subparagraphs (A) and (B), and identification of any variances.

(D) A review of all individuals who accessed the EMSADDS since the last inventory and identification of unauthorized individuals accessing the EMSADDS or suspicious activity.

(E) Identification of possible causes of shortages and overages.

(6) The medical director and designated pharmacist, or medical director and licensed designated paramedic, shall be jointly responsible for monthly review of the inventory reconciliation report, the training, storage, and security of dangerous drugs and dangerous devices, and the restocking of the EMSADDS. Any inventory losses from an EMSADDS
 shall be reported to the board within seven days from identification of the loss.

(7) In order for an individual to perform the functions of a licensed designated paramedic described in this section, that individual shall be licensed by the board pursuant to Section 4202.5. A paramedic who only restocks a secured emergency pharmaceutical supplies container from an EMSADDS need not be licensed with the board.

(8) A record of each access to the EMSADDS, as well as all records used to compile an inventory reconciliation report, shall be maintained at the operator’s location for at least three years in a readily retrievable form. The records shall include the identity of every individual who accessed the system or witnessed such access; the date of each access; and the drug, dosage,
 form, strength, and quantity of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices added or removed.

(b) A violation of any of the provisions of this section shall constitute unprofessional conduct and provides the board the authority to take action against the EMSADDS operator’s license.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 5.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.10.

A pharmacy located in the state may use pharmacists to perform FDA-approved or -authorized tests that are classified as waived pursuant to the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a) and the regulations adopted thereunder by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, under all of the following conditions:

(a) The pharmacy is appropriately licensed as a laboratory under Section 1265.

(b) The pharmacy maintains policies and procedures that do all of the following:

(1) Establish the initial training requirements,
 including specimen collection techniques relevant to a test being performed at the pharmacy, and ongoing training.

(2) Establish safety precautions necessary to protect pharmacy staff and consumers and to reduce the risk of transmission, consistent with Cal-OSHA and CDC requirements, including, but not limited to, provisions for the use of personal protective equipment, cleaning and sanitizing procedures, appropriate biohazard waste requirements, and space requirements for pharmacy staff and consumers.

(3) Ensure the availability of dedicated physically distanced space or other segregated space that provides for privacy during the testing process and private consultation with the pharmacist, and limits potential contamination of other consumers in the pharmacy.

(4) Establish requirements for providing test results to the patient in a nonverbal manner, complying with mandatory reporting requirements to local and state reporting systems, and notifying the patient’s health care providers if consent is provided, and referral to licensed sources of care for confirmation, diagnosis, and treatment as appropriate for followup to positive test results. A health care provider shall not be held personally liable for test results, or for any actions or inactions related to test results they
 did not receive, have knowledge of, or otherwise have access to.

(5) Establish requirements for the pharmacist-in-charge serving as the pharmacy laboratory director to report any reportable disease or condition identified in Section 120130 of the Health and Safety Code or the regulations adopted under that section.

(6) Ensure documentation of testing equipment maintenance and calibration.

(7) Ensure appropriate storage and handling of specimens, testing reagents, and other supplies or equipment that require specialized storage or handling. Specimen collection shall not include vaginal swab, venipuncture, or the collection of seminal fluid.

(c) The test is authorized to be administered by a pharmacist pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 4052.4.

(d) The pharmacist-in-charge does both of the following:

(1) Annually reviews the policies and procedures maintained pursuant to subdivision (b), assesses the pharmacy’s compliance with its
 policies, and documents corrective actions to be taken when noncompliance is found.

(2) Maintains documentation of the annual review and assessment in a readily retrievable format for a period of three years from the date of completion.

(e) The pharmacy maintains documentation related to performing tests that demonstrates compliance with this section, which shall include the name of the pharmacist performing the test, the results of the test, and communication of results to a patient’s primary medical provider, and is maintained in a readily retrievable format for a period of three years from the date of creation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 409)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.11.

(a) A pharmacy located in the state may provide pharmacy services to the patients of a “covered entity,” as defined in Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code, through the use of an automated patient dispensing system located on the premises of the covered entity or on the premises of medical professional practices under contract to provide medical services to covered entity patients, which need not be the same location as the pharmacy, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The pharmacy obtains a license from the board to operate the automated patient dispensing system at the covered entity or affiliated site. As part of the application, the
 pharmacy shall provide the address at which the automated patient dispensing system shall be placed and identify the covered entity. A separate license shall be required for each location and shall be renewed annually concurrent with the pharmacy license.

(2) The pharmacy providing the pharmacy services to the patients of the covered entity, including, unless otherwise prohibited by any other law, patients enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, shall be under contract with that covered entity as described in Section 4126 to provide those pharmacy services through the use of the automated patient dispensing system.

(3) Drugs stored in an automated patient dispensing system shall be part of the inventory of the pharmacy providing pharmacy services to the patients of the covered entity
 and drugs dispensed from the automated patient dispensing system shall be considered to have been dispensed by that pharmacy.

(4) The pharmacy shall maintain records of the acquisition and disposition of dangerous drugs stored in the automated patient dispensing system separate from other pharmacy records.

(5) The pharmacy shall be solely responsible for the security, operation, and maintenance of the automated patient dispensing system.

(6) The pharmacy shall provide training regarding the operation and use of the automated patient dispensing system to both pharmacy and covered entity personnel using the system.

(7) The operation of the automated patient
 dispensing system shall be under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist acting on behalf of the pharmacy providing services to the patients of the covered entity. The pharmacist need not be physically present at the site of the automated patient dispensing system and may
 supervise the system electronically.

(8) Notwithstanding Section 4107, the board may issue a license for the operation of an automated patient dispensing system at an address for which it has issued another site license.

(9) The board, within 30 days after receipt of an application for an automated patient dispensing system license, shall conduct a prelicensure inspection at the proposed location of the automated patient dispensing system. Relocation of the automated patient dispensing system shall require a new application for licensure. Replacement of an automated patient dispensing system shall require notice to the board within 30 days.

(10) The automated patient dispensing system license shall be canceled
 by operation of law if the underlying pharmacy license is not current, valid, and active. Upon reissuance or reinstatement of the underlying pharmacy license, a new application for an automated patient dispensing system license may be submitted to the board.

(11) A pharmacy that holds an automated patient dispensing system license shall advise the board in writing within 30 days if use of the automated patient dispensing system is discontinued.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) An “automated drug delivery system” (ADDS) means a mechanical system that performs operations or activities, other than compounding or administration, relative to the storage, dispensing, or
 distribution of drugs. An ADDS shall collect, control, and maintain all transaction information to accurately track the movement of drugs into and out of the system for security, accuracy, and accountability.

(2) An “automated patient dispensing system” (APDS) is an ADDS for storage and dispensing of prescribed drugs directly to patients pursuant to prior authorization by a pharmacist.

(3) An “automated unit dose system” (AUDS) is an ADDS for storage and retrieval of unit doses of drugs for administration to patients by persons authorized to perform these functions.

(c) (1) An automated patient dispensing system shall collect, control, and maintain all transaction information to accurately track the
 movement of drugs into and out of the system for security, accuracy, and accountability.

(2) Transaction information shall be made readily available in a downloadable format for review and inspection by individuals authorized by law. These records shall be maintained by the pharmacy for a minimum of three years.

(d) Drugs from the automated patient dispensing system may be dispensed directly to the patient, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The pharmacy shall develop, implement, and annually review written policies and procedures with respect to all of the following:

(A) Maintaining the security of the automated patient dispensing system and
 the dangerous drugs and devices within that automated patient dispensing system.

(B) Determining and applying inclusion criteria regarding which drugs and devices are appropriate for placement in the automated patient dispensing system and for which patients.

(C) Ensuring that patients are aware that consultation with a pharmacist is available for any prescription medication, including those delivered via the automated patient dispensing system.

(D) Describing assignment of responsibilities to, and training of, pharmacy personnel, and other personnel using the automated patient dispensing system at the location where the automated patient dispensing system is placed, regarding maintenance and filing procedures for the
 automated patient dispensing system.

(E) Orienting participating patients on the use of the automated patient dispensing system, notifying patients when expected prescription medications are not available in the automated patient dispensing system, and ensuring that patient use of the automated patient dispensing system does not interfere with delivery of drugs and devices.

(F) Ensuring delivery of drugs and devices to patients expecting to receive them from the automated patient dispensing system if the automated patient dispensing system is disabled or malfunctions.

(2) The automated patient dispensing system shall only be used for patients who have signed a written consent demonstrating their informed consent to
 receive prescribed drugs and devices from an automated patient dispensing system and whose use of the automated patient dispensing system meet the criteria pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The automated patient dispensing system shall have a means to identify each patient and only release the identified patient’s drugs and devices to the patient or the patient’s agent.

(4) A pharmacist shall perform all clinical services conducted as part of the dispensing process, including, but not limited to, drug utilization review and consultation.

(5) Drugs shall be dispensed from the automated patient dispensing system only upon authorization from a pharmacist after the pharmacist has reviewed the prescription and the patient’s profile
 for potential contraindications and adverse drug reactions.

(6) All prescribed drugs and devices dispensed from the automated patient dispensing system for the first time shall be accompanied by a consultation conducted by a pharmacist licensed by the board via a telecommunications link that has two-way audio and video.

(7) The automated patient dispensing system shall include a notice, prominently posted on the automated patient dispensing system, that provides the name, address, and telephone number of the pharmacy that holds the automated patient dispensing system license for that automated patient dispensing system.

(8) The labels on all drugs dispensed by the automated patient dispensing system shall comply with Section
 4076 of this code and with Section 1707.5 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(9) Any complaint, error, or omission involving the automated patient dispensing system shall be reviewed as part of the pharmacy’s quality assurance program pursuant to Section 4125.

(10) The board shall not issue a pharmacy more than 15 licenses for automated patient dispensing system units under this section. Consistent with Section 4001.1, the board may adopt regulations to reduce the number of automated patient dispensing system licenses that may be issued to a pharmacy.

(11) The pharmacy holding the license for the automated patient dispensing system shall maintain the policies and procedures developed pursuant to
 paragraph (1) for three years after the last date of use of that automated patient dispensing system.

(e) Access to the automated patient dispensing system shall be controlled and tracked using an identification or password system or biosensor. A system that is accessed via a password system shall include a camera that records a picture of the individual accessing the machine. Picture records shall be maintained for a minimum of 180 days.

(f) The automated patient dispensing system shall make a complete and accurate record of all transactions that will include all users accessing the system and all drugs added to, or removed from, the system.

(g) The stocking of an automated patient dispensing system shall be
 performed by a pharmacist. If the automated patient dispensing system utilizes removable pockets, cards, drawers, similar technology, or unit of use or single dose containers as defined by the United States Pharmacopeia, the stocking system may be done outside of the facility and be delivered to the facility, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The task of placing drugs into the removable pockets, cards, drawers, similar technology, or unit of use or single dose containers is performed by a pharmacist, or by an intern pharmacist or a pharmacy technician working under the direct supervision of a pharmacist.

(2) The removable pockets, cards, drawers, similar technology, or unit of use or single dose containers are transported between the pharmacy and the facility in a
 secure tamper-evident container.

(3) The pharmacy, in conjunction with the covered entity, has developed policies and procedures to ensure that the removable pockets, cards, drawers, similar technology, or unit of use or single dose containers are properly placed into the automated patient dispensing system.
